src/derivation/crk-drv.lexc
LEXICON Finals
# ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-(h)piy:@P.infl.NONTERM@piy F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-n@-(i)n:@P.infl.VII-n@n F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-2@-(iy)aw:@P.infl.VTA-2@aw F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-(o)htê:@P.infl.VAI-v@htê F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-(o)mitanaw:@P.infl.IPC@mitanaw F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-(oh)ôsi:@P.infl.NONTERM@ôsi F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-(om)itanaw:@P.infl.IPC@itanaw F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-(s)po:@P.infl.VAI-v@po F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-(sî)ho:@P.infl.NONTERM@ho F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-(w)isk:@P.infl.NONTERM@isk F2F ;
@P.infl.NI-1@-(way)ân:@P.infl.NI-1@ân F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-(â)so:@P.infl.NONTERM@so F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-(ê)st:@P.infl.NONTERM@st F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-T:@P.infl.NONTERM@T F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@-T:@P.infl.VTA-1@T F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-4@-T:@P.infl.VTA-4@T F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-a:@P.infl.IPC@a F2F ;
@P.infl.IPJ@-a:@P.infl.IPJ@a F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-a:@P.infl.NONTERM@a F2F ;
@P.infl.PrA@-a:@P.infl.PrA@a F2F ;
@P.infl.PrI@-a:@P.infl.PrI@a F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-aT:@P.infl.NONTERM@aT F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-4@-aT:@P.infl.VTA-4@aT F2F ;
@P.infl.IPV@-aci:@P.infl.IPV@aci F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-aci:@P.infl.NONTERM@aci F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-aci:@P.infl.VAI-v@aci F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-n@-acistin:@P.infl.VII-n@acistin F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-aciwan:@P.infl.NONTERM@aciwan F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-aciwê:@P.infl.NONTERM@aciwê F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-aciwê:@P.infl.VAI-v@aciwê F2F ;
@P.infl.NI-2@-aciy:@P.infl.NI-2@aciy F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-aciy:@P.infl.NONTERM@aciy F2F ;
@P.infl.NA-1@-acâp:@P.infl.NA-1@acâp F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-acâp:@P.infl.NONTERM@acâp F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-acâpi:@P.infl.VAI-v@acâpi F2F ;
@P.infl.NI-1@-ah:@P.infl.NI-1@ah F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ah:@P.infl.NONTERM@ah F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-ah:@P.infl.VAI-v@ah F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-v@-ah:@P.infl.VII-v@ah F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@-ah:@P.infl.VTA-1@ah F2F ;
@P.infl.VTI-1@-ah:@P.infl.VTI-1@ah F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-ahciho:@P.infl.VAI-v@ahciho F2F ;
@P.infl.NI-2@-ahciy:@P.infl.NI-2@ahciy F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-ahk:@P.infl.IPC@ahk F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-ahkamik:@P.infl.IPC@ahkamik F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-ahkatoso:@P.infl.VAI-v@ahkatoso F2F ;
@P.infl.NI-3@-ahkw:@P.infl.NI-3@ahkw F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ahkw:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahkw F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ahkâ:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahkâ F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-v@-ahkâ:@P.infl.VII-v@ahkâ F2F ;
@P.infl.NA-2@-ahkêsiw:@P.infl.NA-2@ahkêsiw F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-aho:@P.infl.VAI-v@aho F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-ahoko:@P.infl.VAI-v@ahoko F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-v@-ahotê:@P.infl.VII-v@ahotê F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@-ahoy:@P.infl.VTA-1@ahoy F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@-ahoý:@P.infl.VTA-1@ahoý F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ahpiT:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahpiT F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-ahpiT:@P.infl.VAI-v@ahpiT F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-4@-ahpiT:@P.infl.VTA-4@ahpiT F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-ahpiso:@P.infl.VAI-v@ahpiso F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ahpit:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahpit F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-ahpit:@P.infl.VAI-v@ahpit F2F ;
@P.infl.VTI-1@-ahpit:@P.infl.VTI-1@ahpit F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-aht:@P.infl.NONTERM@aht F2F ;
@P.infl.VTI-1@-aht:@P.infl.VTI-1@aht F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ahtwaw:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahtwaw F2F ;
@P.infl.NA-1@-ahtâmin:@P.infl.NA-1@ahtâmin F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ahtê:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahtê F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-v@-ahtê:@P.infl.VII-v@ahtê F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ahw:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahw F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@-ahw:@P.infl.VTA-1@ahw F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-3@-ahw:@P.infl.VTA-3@ahw F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ahâht:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahâht F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@-ahâht:@P.infl.VTA-1@ahâht F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-ak:@P.infl.IPC@ak F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ak:@P.infl.NONTERM@ak F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-3@-akahw:@P.infl.VTA-3@akahw F2F ;
@P.infl.NI-1@-akan:@P.infl.NI-1@akan F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-n@-akan:@P.infl.VII-n@akan F2F ;
@P.infl.NA-2@-akasiy:@P.infl.NA-2@akasiy F2F ;
@P.infl.NDI-2@-akisiy:@P.infl.NDI-2@akisiy F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-akocin:@P.infl.NONTERM@akocin F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-n@-akocin:@P.infl.VAI-n@akocin F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-akocin:@P.infl.VAI-v@akocin F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-n@-akocin:@P.infl.VII-n@akocin F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-akocî:@P.infl.NONTERM@akocî F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-n@-akotin:@P.infl.VII-n@akotin F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-akotê:@P.infl.VAI-v@akotê F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-v@-akotê:@P.infl.VII-v@akotê F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-akâ:@P.infl.NONTERM@akâ F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-v@-akâ:@P.infl.VII-v@akâ F2F ;
@P.infl.NI-3@-akêskw:@P.infl.NI-3@akêskw F2F ;
@P.infl.NI-1@-am:@P.infl.NI-1@am F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-am:@P.infl.NONTERM@am F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@-am:@P.infl.VTA-1@am F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-am(w):@P.infl.NONTERM@am F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-amahciho:@P.infl.VAI-v@amahciho F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-amaw:@P.infl.NONTERM@amaw F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-2@-amaw:@P.infl.VTA-2@amaw F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-3@-amaw:@P.infl.VTA-3@amaw F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-amo:@P.infl.NONTERM@amo F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-amo:@P.infl.VAI-v@amo F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-v@-amo:@P.infl.VII-v@amo F2F ;
@P.infl.NI-1@-amon:@P.infl.NI-1@amon F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-amon:@P.infl.NONTERM@amon F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-n@-amon:@P.infl.VII-n@amon F2F ;
@P.infl.NA-3@-amw:@P.infl.NA-3@amw F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-amw:@P.infl.NONTERM@amw F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-3@-amw:@P.infl.VTA-3@amw F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-amâ:@P.infl.NONTERM@amâ F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-amâ:@P.infl.VAI-v@amâ F2F ;
@P.infl.NA-3@-amêkw:@P.infl.NA-3@amêkw F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-amêkw:@P.infl.NONTERM@amêkw F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-amô:@P.infl.NONTERM@amô F2F ;
@P.infl.INM@-an:@P.infl.INM@an F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-an:@P.infl.IPC@an F2F ;
@P.infl.NA-1@-an:@P.infl.NA-1@an F2F ;
@P.infl.NI-1@-an:@P.infl.NI-1@an F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-an:@P.infl.NONTERM@an F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-n@-an:@P.infl.VII-n@an F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-v@-an:@P.infl.VII-v@an F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-an(w):@P.infl.NONTERM@an F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-anohk:@P.infl.IPC@anohk F2F ;
@P.infl.NA-1@-as:@P.infl.NA-1@as F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-as:@P.infl.NONTERM@as F2F ;
@P.infl.VTI-1@-as:@P.infl.VTI-1@as F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-asi:@P.infl.NONTERM@asi F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-asi:@P.infl.VAI-v@asi F2F ;
@P.infl.VTI-3@-asi:@P.infl.VTI-3@asi F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-n@-asin:@P.infl.VII-n@asin F2F ;
@P.infl.NA-2@-asiw:@P.infl.NA-2@asiw F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-ask:@P.infl.IPC@ask F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-4@-askaT:@P.infl.VTA-4@askaT F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-askamikw:@P.infl.IPC@askamikw F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-askamikw:@P.infl.NONTERM@askamikw F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-askanow:@P.infl.NONTERM@askanow F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-aski:@P.infl.VAI-v@aski F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@-askih:@P.infl.VTA-1@askih F2F ;
@P.infl.NI-1@-askimot:@P.infl.NI-1@askimot F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-n@-askin:@P.infl.VII-n@askin F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-askinê:@P.infl.VAI-v@askinê F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-v@-askinê:@P.infl.VII-v@askinê F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-askisin:@P.infl.IPC@askisin F2F ;
@P.infl.NA-1@-askisin:@P.infl.NA-1@askisin F2F ;
@P.infl.NI-1@-askisin:@P.infl.NI-1@askisin F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-askisin:@P.infl.NONTERM@askisin F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-askiso:@P.infl.NONTERM@askiso F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-askiso:@P.infl.VAI-v@askiso F2F ;
@P.infl.NI-1@-askit:@P.infl.NI-1@askit F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-askit:@P.infl.VAI-v@askit F2F ;
@P.infl.VTI-2@-askit:@P.infl.VTI-2@askit F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-askitê:@P.infl.NONTERM@askitê F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-v@-askitê:@P.infl.VII-v@askitê F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-askoht:@P.infl.IPC@askoht F2F ;
@P.infl.NA-3@-askw:@P.infl.NA-3@askw F2F ;
@P.infl.NI-3@-askw:@P.infl.NI-3@askw F2F ;
@P.infl.NDI-2@-askway:@P.infl.NDI-2@askway F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-askway:@P.infl.NONTERM@askway F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-aso:@P.infl.NONTERM@aso F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-aso:@P.infl.VAI-v@aso F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ast:@P.infl.NONTERM@ast F2F ;
@P.infl.VTI-1@-ast:@P.infl.VTI-1@ast F2F ;
@P.infl.NA-3@-astimw:@P.infl.NA-3@astimw F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-astâso:@P.infl.VAI-v@astâso F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-astê:@P.infl.NONTERM@astê F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-v@-astê:@P.infl.VII-v@astê F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-3@-astêhw:@P.infl.VTA-3@astêhw F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-asw:@P.infl.NONTERM@asw F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-3@-asw:@P.infl.VTA-3@asw F2F ;
@P.infl.NI-1@-at:@P.infl.NI-1@at F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-at:@P.infl.NONTERM@at F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-4@-at:@P.infl.VTA-4@at F2F ;
@P.infl.VTI-1@-at:@P.infl.VTI-1@at F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-atah:@P.infl.NONTERM@atah F2F ;
@P.infl.VTI-1@-atah:@P.infl.VTI-1@atah F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-3@-atahw:@P.infl.VTA-3@atahw F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-ati:@P.infl.VAI-v@ati F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-atin:@P.infl.IPC@atin F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-atin:@P.infl.NONTERM@atin F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-n@-atin:@P.infl.VII-n@atin F2F ;
@P.infl.NI-2@-atinaw:@P.infl.NI-2@atinaw F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-atinaw:@P.infl.NONTERM@atinaw F2F ;
@P.infl.NA-1@-atoso:@P.infl.NA-1@atoso F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-atoso:@P.infl.VAI-v@atoso F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-atowê:@P.infl.NONTERM@atowê F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-atowê:@P.infl.VAI-v@atowê F2F ;
@P.infl.NA-3@-atw:@P.infl.NA-3@atw F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-atw:@P.infl.NONTERM@atw F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-atwâ:@P.infl.NONTERM@atwâ F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-atâ:@P.infl.VAI-v@atâ F2F ;
@P.infl.VTI-2@-atâ:@P.infl.VTI-2@atâ F2F ;
@P.infl.VTI-1@-atâht:@P.infl.VTI-1@atâht F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-atâm:@P.infl.NONTERM@atâm F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-atâmo:@P.infl.NONTERM@atâmo F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-atâmo:@P.infl.VAI-v@atâmo F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-atê:@P.infl.NONTERM@atê F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-atê:@P.infl.VAI-v@atê F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-v@-atê:@P.infl.VII-v@atê F2F ;
@P.infl.VTI-1@-atêht:@P.infl.VTI-1@atêht F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-aw:@P.infl.IPC@aw F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-aw:@P.infl.NONTERM@aw F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@-aw:@P.infl.VTA-1@aw F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-2@-aw:@P.infl.VTA-2@aw F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-awaT:@P.infl.NONTERM@awaT F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-awak:@P.infl.NONTERM@awak F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-awan:@P.infl.NONTERM@awan F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-n@-awan:@P.infl.VII-n@awan F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-awih:@P.infl.NONTERM@awih F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@-awih:@P.infl.VTA-1@awih F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-awê:@P.infl.NONTERM@awê F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-awê:@P.infl.VAI-v@awê F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-ayak:@P.infl.IPC@ayak F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ayak:@P.infl.NONTERM@ayak F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-ayihk:@P.infl.IPC@ayihk F2F ;
@P.infl.NDI-1@-ayân:@P.infl.NDI-1@ayân F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-ayê:@P.infl.VAI-v@ayê F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-v@-ayê:@P.infl.VII-v@ayê F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-aý:@P.infl.NONTERM@aý F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@-aý:@P.infl.VTA-1@aý F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-aýas:@P.infl.IPC@aýas F2F ;
@P.infl.NA-1@-aýasit:@P.infl.NA-1@aýasit F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-aýêti:@P.infl.VAI-v@aýêti F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-c:@P.infl.IPC@c F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-c:@P.infl.NONTERM@c F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-cihcân:@P.infl.IPC@cihcân F2F ;
@P.infl.NI-1@-cihcân:@P.infl.NI-1@cihcân F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-cihcân:@P.infl.NONTERM@cihcân F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-cim:@P.infl.NONTERM@cim F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@-cim:@P.infl.VTA-1@cim F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-n@-cin:@P.infl.VAI-n@cin F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ciwan:@P.infl.NONTERM@ciwan F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-n@-ciwan:@P.infl.VII-n@ciwan F2F ;
@P.infl.NA-1@-câkan:@P.infl.NA-1@câkan F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-câpi:@P.infl.NONTERM@câpi F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-câpi:@P.infl.VAI-v@câpi F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@-cên:@P.infl.VTA-1@cên F2F ;
@P.infl.VTI-1@-cên:@P.infl.VTI-1@cên F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-h:@P.infl.NONTERM@h F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-h:@P.infl.VAI-v@h F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@-h:@P.infl.VTA-1@h F2F ;
@P.infl.VTI-1@-h:@P.infl.VTI-1@h F2F ;
@P.infl.NI-2@-hcâ:@P.infl.NI-2@hcâ F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-v@-hcâ:@P.infl.VII-v@hcâ F2F ;
@P.infl.VTI-1@-hk:@P.infl.VTI-1@hk F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-hkah:@P.infl.NONTERM@hkah F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-v@-hkahtê:@P.infl.VII-v@hkahtê F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-hkanitêpo:@P.infl.VAI-v@hkanitêpo F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-hkas:@P.infl.NONTERM@hkas F2F ;
@P.infl.VTI-1@-hkas:@P.infl.VTI-1@hkas F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-hkaso:@P.infl.VAI-v@hkaso F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-hkasw:@P.infl.NONTERM@hkasw F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-3@-hkasw:@P.infl.VTA-3@hkasw F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-hkatê:@P.infl.NONTERM@hkatê F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-hkatê:@P.infl.VAI-v@hkatê F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-hkaw:@P.infl.NONTERM@hkaw F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-2@-hkaw:@P.infl.VTA-2@hkaw F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-hkoT:@P.infl.NONTERM@hkoT F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-4@-hkoT:@P.infl.VTA-4@hkoT F2F ;
@P.infl.NI-1@-hkomân:@P.infl.NI-1@hkomân F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-hkopâ:@P.infl.NONTERM@hkopâ F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-v@-hkopâ:@P.infl.VII-v@hkopâ F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-hkosw:@P.infl.NONTERM@hkosw F2F ;
